Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB29.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 227.480 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated
local government or the state shall, according to the Uniform State Building
Code as it pertains to the plan review and inspection responsibilities of local
governments or the state, require any person to obtain a permit before
commencing construction, alteration, or repairs of any electrical system.
(b) The city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated
local government or the state shall require all inspections that are deemed
necessary by the department for the safety of life and property. The
department shall promulgate administrative regulations to describe the
circumstances where inspections are required.
(2) A city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated local
government or the state shall not issue a permit unless the applicant submits proof
of being licensed as an electrical contractor under KRS Chapter 227A or of acting
on behalf of a licensed electrical contractor. However, the provisions of this
subsection shall not apply to:
(a) A homeowner or farmer who does construction, alteration, or repairs of any
electrical system on his or her own premises or any other person exempt from
licensing under KRS 227A.030 or 227A.150;
(b) Electrical work performed by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, a city, county,
urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated local government,
or any subdivision thereof;
(c) A company with a recently deceased licensed electrical contractor, which
shall be granted an interim period of up to one hundred eighty (180)
continuous calendar days by the city, county, urban-county government,
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 12/3/2024 3:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 389
charter county, consolidated local government, or state to allow the company
to utilize the license of the deceased electrical contractor if:
1. The company effectuates and documents all necessary bonding and
insurance policies required by KRS Chapter 227A; and
2. Ensures that the bonding and insurance policies remain in effect for the
entirety of the interim period of time extended; or
(d) A disaster response business as defined in KRS 141.010.
(3) A city, county, urban-county government, charter county, or consolidated local
government shall appoint and may fix the compensation of city, county, urban-
county government, charter county, or consolidated local government electrical
inspectors, and may by ordinance fix reasonable fees and establish other
requirements for the conduct of electrical inspections within its boundaries. All
electrical inspectors shall be certified under KRS 227.489.
(4) Reasonable standards for the construction, alteration, and repair of any electrical
system shall be those adopted in the Uniform State Building Code, as promulgated
by the department, and shall be designed after and may be selected from the
models offered by such model code agencies as the International Code Council,
Inc., the National Fire Protection Association, and other nationally recognized
organizations and[have as a minimum standard the requirements of the National
Electrical Code, which] may include Kentucky amendments. These standards shall
be used by the electrical inspector in making[ his] inspections.
Section 2. KRS 198B.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall adopt and promulgate a mandatory Uniform State Building
Code that establishes standards for the construction of all buildings, as defined in
KRS 198B.010, in the state. The code shall provide that the review and approval, as
necessary, of building plans for conformance with the Uniform State Building Code
prior to construction approval shall be conducted only by the department or a local
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 12/3/2024 3:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 389
government or governments delegated such responsibilities by this chapter, and any
exceptions to this policy shall be explicitly stated in the code.
(2) The code shall be comprehensive and shall include but not be limited to provisions
for general construction; structural quality; mechanical systems to include heating,
cooling, and ventilation; electrical systems; and life safety from hazards of fire,
explosion, and other disasters, whether caused by acts of nature or man. The code
shall encompass the Kentucky State Plumbing Code promulgated pursuant to KRS
318.130, boiler rules and regulations issued pursuant to KRS 236.030, and the[
national] electrical code.
(3) This code shall be designed after and may be selected from the models offered by
such model code agencies as the International Code Council, Inc., the National Fire
Protection Association, and other nationally recognized organizations which may
include governmental agencies. The code shall:
(a) Provide uniform standards and requirements for construction and construction
materials;
(b) To the extent practicable, set forth standards, specifications, and requirements
in terms of performance objectives, so as to facilitate the use of new
technologies, techniques, and materials. The code shall not discriminate in
favor of particular suppliers' materials, techniques, or technologies; and
(c) Protect the public health, safety, and welfare within the state.
(4) The code shall include provisions for the continuing review and possible adoption
of new materials, technologies, and techniques in the building industry when
deemed justified by the department to fulfill the purposes of this chapter. The
department may adopt a model code promulgated by a model code agency only if
that agency provides a method for democratic participation by the department and
any local governments which may enforce the code, in a continuing review and
possible adoption of new materials, technologies, and techniques in the building
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 12/3/2024 3:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 389
industry.
(5) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations, after notice in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, which are necessary to implement the Uniform
State Building Code or to carry out any other responsibility assigned to the
department by this chapter.
(6) The department shall monitor the effectiveness of agencies designated by local
governments to enforce the provisions of the Uniform State Building Code.
(7) If the department determines that an agency is not enforcing the provisions of the
Uniform State Building Code, it shall determine where deficiencies exist. The
department shall require the local government to correct the deficiencies within
sixty (60) days and report to the department its method of correcting the
deficiencies.
(8) If the local government fails to correct the deficiencies, the department may
preempt the local program as provided for in KRS 198B.060(4).
(9) The department shall provide for the supply, including amendments and revisions
thereto, of sufficient copies of the Uniform State Building Code for all interested
parties.
Section 3. KRS 227.450 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 227.450 to 227.500 unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Alteration" means any change, modification, or adjustment to an existing electrical
system or conduit;
(2) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Housing, Buildings
and Construction;
(3) "Department" means the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction;
(4) "Division" means the Electrical Division within the department;
(5) "Electrical" pertains to the installation, alteration, or repair of wires and
conduits for the purpose of transmitting electricity, and the installation of fixtures
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 12/3/2024 3:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 389
and equipment in connection therewith;
(6) "Electrical contractor" means any licensed individual, partnership, or corporation
that is licensed to engage in, offers to engage in, or advertises or holds itself out to
be qualified to engage in designing, planning, superintending, contracting of, or
assuming responsibility for the installation, alteration, or repair of any electrical
system used for the purpose of furnishing heat, light, or power, and employs
electrical workers to engage in this practice. If the electrical contractor is not a
master electrician, the electrical contractor shall employ at least one (1) full-time
master electrician;
(7) "Electrical inspector" means any person certified by the commissioner pursuant
to KRS 227.489 who, for compensation, inspects the construction and installation
of electrical conductors, fittings, devices, and fixtures for light, heat, or power
service equipment to ascertain the compliance with the Uniform State Building
Code promulgated pursuant to KRS 198B.050 or the standards of safety of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(8)[(6)] "Electrical system" means any electrical work subject to standards[ provided
within the National Electrical Code as] adopted in the Uniform State Building
Code, as promulgated by the department;
(9)[(7)] "Electrician" means any person licensed by the department who is employed
by an electrical contractor and is engaged in the construction, alteration, or repair of
any electrical system used for the purpose of furnishing heat, light, or power[;
(8) "Electrical" pertains to the installation, alteration, or repair of wires and conduits for
the purpose of transmitting electricity, and the installation of fixtures and equipment
in connection therewith;
(9) "Electrical inspector" means any person certified by the commissioner pursuant to
KRS 227.489 who, for compensation, inspects the construction and installation of
electrical conductors, fittings, devices, and fixtures for light, heat, or power service
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 12/3/2024 3:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 389
equipment to ascertain the compliance with the National Electrical Code
incorporated in the Uniform State Building Code promulgated pursuant to KRS
198B.050 or the standards of safety of the Commonwealth of Kentucky]; and
(10) "Repair" means the reconstruction or renewal of any part of an existing building for
the purpose of its maintenance.
Section 4. KRS 227.489 is amended to read as follows:
The commissioner shall require electrical inspectors to be certified. Examinations shall be
based on[ the National Electrical Code incorporated in] the Uniform State Building Code
and the standards of safety prescribed by the department. Electrical inspectors who have
been engaged in the inspection of electrical light and power wiring installations, based on
the requirements of the National Electrical Code, for a period of three (3) years, may be
certified on the basis of knowledge of this subject and experience. No certificate shall be
denied, suspended, or revoked unless the applicant or certificate holder is afforded the
opportunity for a hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
Section 5. KRS 227.810 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A ground-fault circuit-interrupter shall be installed on all existing and new
fountains and pools that are located in a public place within the Commonwealth, in
accordance with standards set forth in the Uniform State Building Code[ National
Electrical Code] adopted by administrative regulations of the department.
(2) A state or local government agency shall not promulgate an administrative
regulation or ordinance to exempt any fountain or pool located in a public place
from the required installation of a ground-fault circuit-interrupter, regardless of the
age of construction of the fountain or pool.
Section 6. KRS 227A.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 227A.010 to 227A.140, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Authorized local licensing program" means any city, county, urban-county
government, charter county, or consolidated local government electrician and
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 12/3/2024 3:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 389
electrical contractor licensing program established by local ordinance for the
purpose of licensing electrical workers. "Authorized local licensing program" shall
include a licensing program established through a cooperative agreement between
two (2) or more counties;
(2) "Department" means the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction;
(3) "Electrical" pertains to the installation, alteration, or repair of wires and conduits for
the purpose of transmitting electricity, and the installation of fixtures and equipment
in connection therewith;
(4) "Electrical contractor" means any licensed individual, partnership, or corporation
that is licensed to engage in, offers to engage in, or advertises or holds itself out to
be qualified to engage in designing, planning, superintending, contracting of, or
assuming responsibility for the installation, alteration, or repair of any electrical
system used for the purpose of furnishing heat, light, or power, and employs
electrical workers to engage in this practice. If the electrical contractor is not a
master electrician, the electrical contractor shall employ at least one (1) full-time
master electrician; however, no master electrician shall act in this capacity for more
than one (1) electrical contractor;
(5) "Electrical system" means any electrical work subject to standards[ provided within
the National Electrical Code as] adopted in the Uniform State Building Code, as
promulgated by the department;
(6) "Electrician" means any person licensed by the department who is employed by an
electrical contractor and is engaged in the construction, alteration, or repair of any
electrical system used for the purpose of furnishing heat, light, or power;
(7) "Maintenance worker or maintenance engineer" means a person who is a regular,
bona fide employee or agent of a property owner, property lessor, property
management company, or firm that is not in the electrical business but has
jurisdiction over the property where the routine maintenance of electrical systems is
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 12/3/2024 3:29 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 389
being performed;
(8) "Master electrician" means any individual licensed to engage in, and assume
responsible charge, supervision, or direction of an electrician engaged in the
construction, installation, alteration, or repair of any electrical system used to
furnish heat, light, or power;
(9) "Repair" means the reconstruction or renewal of any part of an existing building for
the purpose of its maintenance; and
(10) (a) "Routine maintenance of electrical systems" means the routine and periodic
servicing of electrical systems, including cleaning, inspecting, and making
adjustments to ensure the proper operation and the removal or replacement of
component parts.
(b) "Routine maintenance of electrical systems" does not include the installation
of complete electrical systems.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 12/3/2024 3:29 PM Jacketed